Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-804
Subcontractor; lien.

Any person, who shall under contract perform any labor or furnish any material or services as a subcontractor under an original contractor or for or to an original contractor or a subcontractor under an original contractor, shall be entitled to a lien upon all the property upon which the lien of an original contractor may attach to the same extent as an original contractor. The lien provided for in this section shall further extend and attach to all materials and fixtures owned by such original contractor or subcontractor to or for whom the labor is performed or material or services furnished and used or employed, or furnished to be used or employed in the drilling or operating of such oil or gas wells, or in the construction of such pipeline.

Laws 1957, c. 241, § 4, p. 810.